Hawaii statutes.
[§414-250] Nonexclusivity of subpart.
(a) The indemnification provided by this subpart shall not be deemed exclusive
of any other rights to which those indemnified may be entitled under any bylaw,
agreement, vote of shareholders, or disinterested directors or otherwise, both
as to action in a person's official capacity and as to action in another
capacity while holding the office, and shall continue as to a person who has
ceased to be an agent and shall inure to the benefit of the heirs and personal
representatives of that person.

(b) This subpart does not apply to any
proceeding against any trustee, investment manager, or other fiduciary of an
employee benefit plan in that person's capacity, though the person may also be
an agent of the employer corporation. Nothing contained in this section shall
limit any right to indemnification to which a trustee, investment manager, or
other fiduciary may be entitled by contract or otherwise. [L 2000, c 244, pt of
§1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next